Utah statutes.
17-36-11.1.   Tentative budget -- Public record prior to adoption.

(1)  This section does not apply to a county of the first class.

(2)  The tentative budget and all supportive schedules and data shall be a public record available for inspection during business hours at the offices of the county clerk or auditor for at least 10 days prior to the public hearing on the adoption of a final budget.

